Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2211
Treasurer's books; penalty for neglect to keep.

Any such treasurer who shall fail regularly to enter upon his cash book the amounts so received and receipted for, or who shall fail to keep his cash book footed from day to day as required by section 77-2210, for the space of three days, shall forfeit for each offense the sum of one hundred dollars, to be recovered in a civil action on his official bond by any person holding a warrant drawn on such treasurer, one-half to the person bringing such action, and one-half to the school fund of the county in which such action is brought.

Laws 1871, § 9, p. 115;

R.S.1913, § 6650;

C.S.1922, § 6181;

C.S.1929, § 77-2409;

R.S.1943, § 77-2211.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).